California statutes. Education Code
(5) Special parking, including on-campus parking registration, temporary parking permit arrangements, and application assistance for students who do not have state handicapped placards or license plates.

(6) Supplemental specialized orientation to acquaint students with the campus environment.

(7) Activities to coordinate and administer specialized services and instruction.

(8) Activities to assess the planning, implementation, and effectiveness of disabled student services and programs.

The baseline cost of these services shall be determined by the respective system and fully funded with annual adjustments for inflation and salary range changes, to the extent funds are provided.

(b) Continuing variable costs that fluctuate with changes in the number of students or the unit load of students. These continuing variable costs are costs for services that vary in frequency depending on the needs of students, such as the following:

(1) Diagnostic assessment, including both individual and group assessment not otherwise provided by the institution to determine functional, educational, or employment levels or to certify specific disabilities.

(2) On-campus mobility assistance, including mobility training and orientation and manual or automatic transportation assistance to and from college courses and related educational activities.

(3) Off-campus transportation assistance, including transporting students with disabilities to and from the campus in areas where accessible public transportation is unavailable, inadequate, or both.

(4) Disability-related counseling and advising, including specialized academic, vocational, personal, and peer counseling, that is developed specifically for disabled students and not duplicated by regular counseling and advising services available to all students.

(5) Interpreter services, including manual and oral interpreting for deaf and hard-of-hearing students.

(6) Reader services to coordinate and provide access to information required for equitable academic participation if this access is unavailable in other suitable modes.

(7) Services to facilitate the repair of equipment and learning assistance devices.

(8) Special class instruction that does not duplicate existing college courses but is necessary to meet the unique educational needs of particular groups of disabled students.

(9) Speech services, provided by licensed speech or language pathologists for students with verified speech disabilities.

(10) Test taking facilitation, including adapting tests for and proctoring test taking by, disabled students.

(11) Transcription services, including, but not limited to, the provision of Braille and print materials.

(12) Specialized tutoring services not otherwise provided by the institution. 

(13) Notetaker services for writing, notetaking, and manual manipulation for classroom and related academic activities.

State funds may be provided annually for the cost of these services on an actual-cost basis, including wages for the individuals providing these services and expenses for attendant supplies. Each institution shall be responsible for documenting its costs to the appropriate state agencies.

(c) One-time variable costs associated with the purchase or replacement of equipment. One-time variable costs are one-time expenditures for the purchase of supplies or the repair of equipment, such as adapted educational materials and vehicles. State funds shall be provided for these expenses on an actual cost basis as documented by each institution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

67312.

(a) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, for their respective systems, do all of the following:

(1) Work with the Department of Finance to develop formulas or procedures for allocating funds authorized under this chapter.

(2) Adopt rules and regulations necessary to the operation of programs funded pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Develop and implement, in consultation with students and staff, a system for evaluating state-funded programs and services for disabled students on each campus at least
 every five years. At a minimum, these systems shall provide for the gathering of program cost and budget breakdowns, outcome data, staff and student perceptions of program effectiveness, and data on the implementation of the program and physical accessibility requirements of the Federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794).

(b) (1) The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, for their respective systems, provide, as part of established college personnel onboarding and training, information regarding disability access and compliance pursuant to Section 67312.5.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and community college districts shall collaborate to provide, as part of established college personnel onboarding and training, information regarding disability
 access and compliance pursuant to Section 67312.5.

(c) Commencing in January 1990, and every two years thereafter, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall submit a report to the Governor and the education policy committees of the Legislature describing its efforts to serve students with disabilities. These biennial reports shall also include a review on a campus-by-campus basis of the enrollment, retention, transition, and graduation rates of disabled students, including categorical funding of those programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 905, Sec. 1.   (AB 2821)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67312.5.

(a) The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California and the governing boards of independent postsecondary institutions are requested to, each establish a Disability Access and Compliance Training Program for their campuses. A Disability Access and Compliance Training Program shall be included within existing college personnel training and provided to college personnel upon onboarding.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2026, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall establish a Disability Access and Compliance Training Program for California Community College campuses. On or before the start of the 2026–27 academic year, community college districts shall
 include the Disability Access and Compliance Training Program within existing college personnel training and provide the training to college personnel upon onboarding.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop the training components described in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (c). Each community college district shall develop the training components described in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c).

(c) A Disability Access and Compliance Training Program established pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The legal and procedural responsibility of college personnel to provide effective accommodations for disabled students, the implementation and administration of this responsibility, and the campus, criminal, and
 civil consequences for failing to comply with this responsibility.

(2) Guidance regarding constructing and enforcing accessibility fixtures and practices in the universal design of campus coursework and classrooms.

(3) Common facts and myths regarding anti-disability and ableist stigmas and prejudices, including guidance on how to mitigate and report instances of anti-disability and ableist discrimination and harassment.

(4) The availability of, and contact information for, academic, campus, and local community resources for individuals experiencing anti-disability or ableist discrimination or harassment.

(5) Training on how to increase access to campus academic accommodations hubs, disability students program faculty liaisons, academic accommodations
 guidance, disability access center disability access liaison team members, designated campus department ambassadors, and any other relevant campus personnel to offer additional support to students with disabilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 905, Sec. 2.   (AB 2821)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67313.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to be directing any student, or students, toward a particular program or service for students with disabilities nor shall anything in this chapter be used to deny any student an education because he or she does not wish to receive state funded disabled student programs and services.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.25. Office Equipment [67320. - 67320.]

67320.

Each campus of the California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California shall consider human and ergonomic factors, including human health and safety, human comfort, and equipment usefulness when they select and procure office equipment and related support equipment.

The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Regents of the University of California shall adopt regulations that are necessary to carry out this chapter.

For purposes of this chapter, “office equipment and related support equipment” includes, but is not limited to, electronic equipment, typewriters, chairs, and tables.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1303, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.27. Contracts [67325. - 67328.]

67325.

For the purposes of this article, “contract” means a research, training, or service agreement between the state and the University of California or the California State University, or a grant from the state to the University of California or the California State University for research, training, or service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 20)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67326.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The University of California and the California State University comprise two important parts of the state’s public university system.

(b) The University of California and the California State University receive about six billion dollars ($6,000,000,000) from the State General Fund each year.

(c) In the 2006–07 fiscal year, state agencies and departments entered into more than 2,500 contracts or contract amendments with the University of California and the California State University.

(d) Many of these contracts
 contain similar provisions, such as provisions dealing with issues relating to liability, intellectual property, the right to undertake additional research, the right to publish, hiring, personnel, invoicing, and payments.

(e) The provisions of each contract or contract amendment are typically negotiated between attorneys representing the state agencies and departments and attorneys representing the University of California and the California State University.

(f) The drafting of many of these contracts takes six months to a year, and, in many cases, the state is paying for both sides of the contract negotiations.

(g) It would be more cost effective and efficient if the state and the University of California and the California State University would establish standardized “boilerplate” provisions that would apply to
 all contracts between the state and the University of California or the California State University, allowing for variations only in unusual situations.

(h) The federal government has established the Federal Demonstration Partnership, which provides for uniform contracting provisions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 20)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67327.

(a) The Department of General Services, acting for the state, shall, negotiate and establish a model contract with standard contract provisions with the Regents of the University of California and a model contract with standard contract provisions with the Trustees of the California State University by July 1, 2010. The trustees shall, and the regents are urged to, negotiate and establish with the Department of General Services the model contract applicable to their university by July 1, 2010. The Department of General Services shall seek the active participation of state agencies and departments that have contracts with the University of California or the California State University. The model contract may be revised in a manner determined by the University of California or the California State University
 and the Department of General Services, in consultation with state agencies and departments that have contracts with the University of California or the California State University. To the extent feasible, these standard contract provisions shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, provisions relating to all of the following:

(1) Liability.

(2) Intellectual property.

(3) The right to undertake additional research.

(4) The right to publish.

(5) Hiring and other personnel-related matters.

(6) Invoicing.

(7) Payments.

(8) Dispute resolution.

(9) Travel.

(10) Termination.

(11) Administrative overhead and indirect costs.

(b) The standard provisions in a model contract agreed upon pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used in contracts entered into between the University of California or the California State University and the state, unless both contracting parties mutually determine that a specified standard contract provision is inappropriate or inadequate for a specified contract.

(c) In implementing this section, the Department of General Services may use the services of any state agency, as that term is defined in Section 11000 of the
 Government Code.

(d) The Department of General Services and the University of California or the California State University, in consultation with state agencies and departments that have contracts with the University of California or the California State University, may determine those types of contracts for which the use of the model contract would be inappropriate or inadequate.

(e) It is not the intent of the Legislature that the model contract provisions waive the requirements of the law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 20)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67328.

The California State University and the University of California, if the University of California participates in the model contracting process created pursuant to this chapter, shall be responsible for the facilitation and associated support costs of the Department of General Services required to implement the provisions of this chapter, excluding the Department of General Services’ legal costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 402, Sec. 1.   (AB 20)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.28. California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund Act of 2022 [67329.1. - 67329.9.]



  ARTICLE 1. Title [67329.1. - 67329.1.]

67329.1.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund Act of 2022.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [67329.2. - 67329.2.]

67329.2.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Allocation” means the portion of the initial California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund Act of 2022 appropriation allocated to each designated authority to provide loans pursuant to this chapter.

(b) “Authority” means, for a college applicant, the California School Finance Authority created and authorized pursuant to the California School Finance Authority Act (Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 17170) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1). For a university applicant, “authority” means the California Educational Facilities Authority created and authorized pursuant to the California
 Educational Facilities Authority Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 94100) of Part 59 of Division 10). The meaning of “authority” as used in this chapter depends on the college or university system of which the applicant is a member.

(c) “Campus” means a community college district, or a campus of the University of California or the California State University.

(d) “College applicant” means a community college district, or the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges on behalf of a community college district.

(e) “Faculty and staff housing project” means one or more housing facilities to be occupied by faculty or staff of one or more campuses, and owned by a participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity.

(f) “Fund” means the California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund established by this chapter.

(g) “Participating nonprofit entity” means an entity within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(h) “Project” means a student housing project or a faculty and staff housing project.

(i) “Student housing project” means one or more housing facilities to be occupied by students of one or more campuses and owned by a participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity. These facilities are determined to be educational facilities, which also may include dining, academic and student support service spaces, and other necessary and usual attendant and related facilities and equipment.

(j) “University applicant” means a campus of the University of California or the California State University, the Office of the President of the University of California on behalf of one or more campuses of the University of California, or the Office of the Chancellor of the California State University on behalf of one or more campuses of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund [67329.3. - 67329.3.]

67329.3.

(a) (1) The California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury to provide zero-interest loans to qualifying college and university applicants for the purpose of constructing affordable student housing and affordable faculty and staff housing. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for purposes of this chapter.

(2) (A) For the 2023–24 fiscal year, the sum of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, to be deposited in the California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund.

(B) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in the 2024–25 fiscal year, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in the 2025–26 fiscal year, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in the 2026–27 fiscal year, three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in the 2027–28 fiscal year, and three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) in the 2028–29 fiscal year, to be deposited in the California Student Housing Revolving Loan Fund.

(3) Of the total amount appropriated pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2), and intended to be appropriated pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), in support of this chapter, 75 percent of the available funds shall be available for University of California and California State University applicants and 25 percent of the available funds shall be available for community college applicants.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), the amounts designated in paragraph (3) for the postsecondary segments may be adjusted to shift unused funds from a segment to accommodate excess demand from another segment, upon written notification by the Director of Finance to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, and approval by the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. This written notification may be submitted 12 months after the funds for a fiscal year have been appropriated.

(b) The Treasurer may pledge any or all of the moneys in the fund as security for payment of the principal of, and interest on, a particular issuance of bonds by a designated lending authority pursuant to this chapter. For that purpose, or as convenient or necessary to the accomplishment of any other purpose of this chapter, the Treasurer may divide the fund into separate accounts or subaccounts.

(c) The Treasurer may invest moneys in the fund that are not required for its current needs, including proceeds from the sale of bonds, in eligible securities specified in Section 16430 of the Government Code, and may include deposit for investment in the Surplus Money Investment Fund pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest or other
 increment resulting from the investment or deposit of moneys from the fund shall be deposited in the fund. Moneys in the fund shall not be subject to transfer to any other funds pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except to the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(d) If the Treasurer sells bonds for either authority that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes, subject to designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the investment of bond proceeds and for the investment of earnings on those proceeds. The Treasurer may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds required or desirable under
 federal law to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 5.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Criteria and Process [67329.4. - 67329.51.]

67329.4.

(a) Each authority shall develop a uniform application that includes requests for relevant information, such as project goals, costs, number of students or faculty and staff to be housed, timeline for the project, financial feasibility of the project, and other information deemed necessary for evaluation of creditworthiness and public benefit criteria established by each authority pursuant to this chapter. The applications shall be available no later than April 1, 2024, in accordance with each authority’s existing regulations or any necessary amendments, which shall be undertaken as emergency regulations, if necessary.

(b) The initial preliminary applications for projects to be considered pursuant to this chapter shall be submitted to
 the designated authority no later than July 1, 2024. Thereafter, the authority may establish subsequent application periods, as necessary.

(c) Applications may be submitted to the designated authority by college and university applicants as set forth in this chapter pursuant to the following:

(1) The California Educational Facilities Authority shall consider applications from university applicants.

(2) The California School Finance Authority shall consider applications from college applicants.

(d) Applications shall demonstrate all of the following:

(1) Construction on the project could begin by June 30, 2025, or by the earliest possible date thereafter, as stated in the application.

(2) The rate for student, staff, and faculty housing supported by the fund will be below local market rental rates for comparable student, staff, and faculty housing, and may take into account the costs of utilities, food service, operations, maintenance, and other services included in the student, staff, and faculty housing rent.

(3) Receipt of a loan from the authority shall result in a public benefit, such as the ability to reduce rents, serve more students, provide additional onsite student support services, or other tangible benefits that would not be practical without receipt of the loan.

(4) The project will comply with the requirements of Section 67329.5.

(5) The project will be owned by a participating college or university or participating
 nonprofit entity.

(e) In the event that an authority receives or anticipates receiving more applications than its allocation of state funding can support, the authority may consider any of the following criteria in selecting projects:

(1) The timeline for construction, with priority given to projects that can begin construction the earliest.

(2) The campus’ unmet demand for student housing, with priority given to applicants with greater unmet demand for student housing.

(3) A local match is available, with priority given to applicants with a local match.

(4) When considered as a whole, the applications approved pursuant to this chapter are fairly representative of various geographical
 regions of the state and the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

67329.5.

A project financed pursuant to this chapter shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) For projects financed pursuant to this chapter that are not University of California projects, all work traditionally performed by employees of the college or university applicant shall be performed only by those employees.

(b) For projects financed pursuant to this chapter that are projects of the University of California or projects benefiting the University of California, the following requirements apply:

(1) As a condition of receiving money financed pursuant to this chapter, the University of California shall certify that all
 cleaning, maintenance, groundskeeping, food service, or other work traditionally performed by persons with University of California Service Unit (SX) job classifications shall be performed only by employees of the University of California at each beneficially affected facility, building, or other property.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to, and shall not restrict the performance of, work done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of public funds, when the work is either of the following:

(A) Construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work, including work performed during the design, preconstruction, and postconstruction phases of construction.

(B) Carpentry, electrical, plumbing, glazing, painting, and other craft work designed to preserve, protect, or keep any publicly owned
 facility in a safe and continuously usable condition, including repairs, cleaning, and other operations on machinery and other equipment permanently attached to the building or real property as fixtures.

(3) The Department of Finance shall approve new or additional money for University of California projects financed pursuant to this chapter only after the University of California has demonstrated ongoing and continuous compliance with this subdivision. A demonstration of compliance shall include a certification of compliance signed by the President of the University of California, or their duly authorized designee, indicating that at each project facility, building, or other property benefiting from money financed pursuant to this chapter the following will occur or has occurred:

(A) All work specified in paragraph (1) of this subdivision will be performed exclusively by
 University of California employees.

(B) Either of the following:

(i) All work described in paragraph (1) of this subdivision has been performed exclusively by University of California employees at all times since the University of California received money for the project pursuant to this chapter.

(ii) The University of California shall provide a written report detailing any noncompliance with paragraph (1) of this subdivision, specifying how many contract workers performed work at each project facility, building, or other property benefiting from money financed pursuant to this chapter, for what periods of time, and what the University of California has done to remedy the noncompliance, and, on or before February 1 of each calendar year, shall certify to the satisfaction of the Department of Finance that it has
 maintained subsequent compliance with paragraph (1) of this subdivision.

(4) The University of California shall include the certification required pursuant to this subdivision with the certification required pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 92495.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 572, Sec. 2.   (AB 190)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

67329.51.

(a) For projects financed pursuant to this chapter, participating colleges and universities and participating nonprofit entities shall do all of the following:

(1) At least seven days before issuing a bid solicitation for the project, send a notice of the solicitation that describes the project to the following entities within the jurisdiction of the proposed project site:

(A) Any bona fide labor organization representing workers in the building and construction trades who may perform work necessary to complete the project.

(B) Any organization representing contractors that may perform work necessary to complete the project.

(2) Ensure that all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project will be required to pay prevailing wages for any proposed construction, alteration, or repair in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code. All of the following shall occur:

(A) The participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of all construction work.

(B) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the
 applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(C) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), all contractors and subcontractors shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code, and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided therein.

(D) Except as provided in subparagraph (E), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the development, or by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee though a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty
 assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(E) Subparagraphs (C) and (D) shall not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a multicraft building trades project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the development and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(3) For projects financed pursuant to this chapter with onsite construction, alteration, or
 repair costs totaling twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) or more, seek bids containing an enforceable commitment that all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform any rehabilitation, construction, or alterations work on the project that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(4) For the purpose of establishing a bidder pool of eligible contractors and subcontractors that satisfy the skilled and trained workforce requirements, establish a process to prequalify prime contractors and subcontractors, including, but not limited to, electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractors. This process shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following requirements:

(A) The participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity shall only accept
 bids from prime contractors that have been prequalified and listed as eligible contractors.

(B) If the participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity receives at least two bids from prequalified prime contractors, the contract shall be awarded to the lowest qualified bidder and the participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity shall certify to the authority that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the development.

(C) If the participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity receives fewer than two bids from prequalified prime contractors, the contract may be rebid and awarded to the lowest responsive bidder without the skilled and trained workforce requirement applying to the prime contractor’s scope of work.

(D) Prime contractors shall only accept bids and list subcontractors from the prequalified list. If the prime contractor receives bids from at least 2 subcontractors in each tier listed on the prequalified list, the prime contractor shall require that the contract for that tier or scope of work will require a skilled and trained workforce.

(E) If the prime contractor fails to receive at least 2 bids from subcontractors listed on the prequalified list in any tier, the prime contractor will not require that a skilled and trained workforce be used for that scope of work, and may list subcontractors that do not appear on the prequalified list.

(F) The participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity shall establish minimum qualifications that are, to the maximum extent possible, quantifiable and objective. Only criterion, and minimum thresholds for
 any criterion, that are reasonably necessary to ensure that any bidder awarded a project can successfully complete the proposed scope shall be used by the project proponent.

(G) All bids submitted by prime contractors and subcontractors shall be sealed, opened in a public process that is open to all bidders and other interested parties, and listed on the participating college’s or university’s or participating nonprofit entity’s internet website.

(H) The Subletting and Subcontracting Fair Practices Act established pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall apply.

(5) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), provide to the authority on a monthly basis while the development or contract is being performed a report demonstrating
 compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. A monthly report provided to the authority pursuant to this subparagraph shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection. A participating college or university or participating nonprofit entity that fails to provide a monthly report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided. Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed
 by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the development using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(B) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the development are subject to a multicraft building trades project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(6) Notify the Department of
 Industrial Relations within five calendar days of the contract award.

(b) For purposes of this section, “skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 45.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Repayment and Bond Issuance [67329.6. - 67329.6.]

67329.6.

(a) For each loan made by an authority, the authority shall establish a schedule of payments, the primary source of which may be lease or rent payments for occupancy of the project financed by that loan, and the sum of which shall be calculated to result in full payment of the loan within a reasonable period of time not to exceed 30 years.

(b) The California Educational Facilities Authority may issue revenue bonds and enter into related agreements, and take all other actions necessary and convenient for the issuance of revenue bonds for university applicants for projects in accordance with this chapter and its authorizing statutes, as amended from time to time.

(c) Each
 authority may use amounts deposited in the fund, including, but not limited to, loan repayments, as a source of reserve and security for the payment of principal and interest on revenue bonds, the proceeds of which are deposited in the fund or in a designated fund or account of the authority established for that purpose. The purpose of any such revenue bonds is to augment the fund.
